src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON ARABICCASEORD  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  +Sg+Gen:%>da    K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>dav   K ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>dij   K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>dijn  K ;
! +Sg+Ess:%>din   K ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>da    K ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>dij   K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>dijt  K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>dijda K ;
! +Pl+Com:%>dij   K ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  +Sg+Gen:%>a    K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>av   K ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>ij   K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>ijn  K ;
! +Sg+Ess:%>in   K ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>a    K ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ij   K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>ijt  K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;
! +Pl+Com:%>ij   K ;

LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  +Sg+Nom:%>s    K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>sa   K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>sav  K ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>sij  K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>sin  K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>sis  K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>sijn K ;

 

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Rom+Sg+Ill:%>hán        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Ill:%>n        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Loc:%>st        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Com:%>jn       # ;
 +Rom+Ess:%>n        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Par:%>d        # ;


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !
